Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB93.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending the present Constitution of Kentucky
to add a new section enshrining and protecting the current expansion of Medicaid
eligibility for non-disabled, low-income adults whose income does not exceed 138% of
the federal poverty level and prohibiting additional burdens or restrictions on eligibility
or enrollment standards except as may be required under federal law?
SECTION 2. IT IS PROPOSED THAT A NEW SECTION BE ADDED TO
THE CONSTITUTION OF KENTUCKY TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Commonwealth of Kentucky shall, to the extent permitted under federal
law, provide Medicaid benefits to any person aged nineteen to sixty-four whose income
is at or below one hundred thirty-eight percent of the federal poverty level for the
applicable family size, as authorized by federal law. Any person who qualifies under
this section shall receive coverage that meets or exceeds the benchmark or benchmark-
equivalent coverage requirements, as those terms are defined by federal law.
(2) The Commonwealth of Kentucky shall not impose greater or additional
burdens or restrictions on eligibility or enrollment standards, methodologies, or
practices on any person eligible under this section than those imposed on any person
otherwise eligible for Medicaid under Kentucky law, except that the Commonwealth of
Kentucky may, to the extent required by federal law or regulation, impose a work
requirement or cost-sharing requirement on any person eligible under this section.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/7/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1142
Secretary of State shall cause the question in Section 1 of this Act and the entirety of the
proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section 2 of this Act
to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation published in this
state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the same manner the
fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their acceptance or rejection at
the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be voted for.
The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415 shall be made no later than the
first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, not
later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August preceding the next
regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen in a year in
which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not
later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election
in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United
States, the Secretary of State shall certify the complete text of Section 1 of this Act and
the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk shall have
the entirety of the text and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the ballots
provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting machines in
use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/7/2026 1:35 PM Jacketed